Massachusetts, session 194th, H4934.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 10Z the following new section:- 
Section 10AA. Coverage for non-opioid pain medications.  
(a) As used in this section, the following word shall, unless the context clearly requires 
otherwise, have the following meaning:  
“Non-opioid drug” means a non-opioid drug approved by the federal Food and Drug 
Administration for the treatment or management of pain. 
(b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance 
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract 
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage 
such that no non-opioid drug shall be disadvantaged or discouraged with respect to coverage 

of 6 12 relative to any opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain, where 
impermissible disadvantaging or discouragement includes, without limitation:  
(1) designating any such non-opioid drug as a non-preferred drug if any opioid or 
narcotic drug is designated as a preferred drug on the MassHealth Drug List; or  
(2) establishing more restrictive or more extensive utilization management procedures, 
including, but not limited to, more restrictive or more extensive prior authorization or step 
therapy protocols, for such non-opioid drug than the least restrictive or extensive utilization 
management procedures applicable to any such opioid or narcotic drug.  
SECTION 3. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the division 
of medical assistance shall ensure the availability of accessible, quality health care for 
individuals with chronic pain who are enrolled in Medicaid managed care organizations or 
accountable care organizations that have a contract with the division to provide services to 
individuals enrolled under MassHealth pursuant to section 9 of chapter 118E of the General 
Laws. Such health care shall include, but not be limited to the following: 
(1) comprehensive integrated care management for chronic pain patients, including 
primary care, medical specialty care (including but not limited to pain management specialists, 
neurologists, rheumatologists), and specialized treatment providers (including but not limited to 
physical therapists, occupational therapists, chiropractors, acupuncturists, psychologists, massage 
therapists) as specified in individualized pain treatment plans;  
(2) social work services as well as education on chronic pain management for patients, 
caregivers, and providers; and  

of 6 33  (3) support navigating health insurance coverage and support with transportation to 
primary care and specialty providers. 
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the division of medical assistance shall require 
Medicaid managed care or accountable care organizations to implement a chronic pain quality 
strategy for children and adults with chronic pain that includes, but is not limited to, the 
following components: 
(1) measurable goals to improve the identification of members with chronic pain within 
90 days after enrolling in the contracted health plan;  
(2) to the extent practicable, adequate provider network capacity to ensure timely access 
to chronic pain specialty service providers as listed above;  
(3) care coordination strategies and supports to help members with chronic pain access 
appropriate providers including primary care, medical specialists, other specialized care 
providers of therapies included in the treatment plan and other related care supports; and  
(4) delivery of a training curriculum approved by the division of medical assistance to 
educate primary care providers on the treatment of those with chronic pain, including 
information on the components of comprehensive chronic pain treatment including but not 
limited to pain assessment and diagnosis, administration of a validated pain rating tool, the 
development, implementation and revision of an individualized treatment plan, medication 
management, any necessary chronic pain crisis management, and care coordination and 
communication among providers furnishing various treatments; and on multidisciplinary pain 
care encompassing the full range of evidence-based treatments in five areas: restorative 

of 6 54 therapies, medications, interventional procedures, behavioral therapies and complementary 
treatments.  
(c) The division of medical assistance shall also, not later than January 1, 2026, and in 
partnership with Medicaid managed care organizations and accountable care organizations, 
identify, document, and share best practices regarding chronic pain care management and care 
coordination with Medicaid-enrolled primary care and specialty providers with a goal of 
improving services for members with chronic pain and their families. 
SECTION 1. Chapter 12C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 24 the following new section:- 
Section 25. Data collection and reports on the incidence and prevalence of chronic pain in 
the commonwealth. 
(a) The center shall utilize available federal and state data, including health care data 
collected under sections 8, 9, and 10, to clarify the incidence and prevalence of chronic pain 
experienced by individuals in the commonwealth from any source, including injuries, surgeries, 
diseases and conditions.  
(b) The center shall also identify gaps in the available research data and collect 
deidentified population research data using medical claims and survey data to fill gaps in 
available research data.  
(c) In its review of the relevant research data, the center shall identify information 
concerning:  

of 6 74  (1) incidence and prevalence of chronic pain and of all specific known chronic pain 
conditions as well as of diseases and conditions that include or lead to chronic pain;  
(2) demographics and other information, such as age, race, ethnicity, gender, and 
geographic location overall and for specific known chronic pain conditions;  
(3) risk factors that may be associated with chronic pain conditions, such as genetic and 
environmental risk factors and other information, as appropriate;  
(4) diagnosis and progression markers;  
(5) direct health care costs of chronic pain treatment, both traditional and alternative, and 
indirect costs of  chronic pain; (such as missed work, public and private disability, and reduction 
in productivity); 
(6) the epidemiology of the conditions;  
(7) the detection, management, and treatment of the conditions;  
(8) the epidemiology, detection, management, and treatment of secondary or co-occurring 
conditions, such as depressive, anxiety, and substance use disorders;  
(9) the utilization of medical and social services by patients with chronic pain conditions; 
and 
(10) the effectiveness of evidence-based treatment approaches for chronic pain 
conditions.  
(d) Not later than 2 years after the date of enactment of this Act, and every two years 
thereafter, the center shall publish a report concerning the incidence, prevalence and 

of 6 94 demographics of chronic pain and specific chronic pain conditions experienced by individuals in 
the commonwealth. Such report shall address the information outlined in subsection (c). Such 
report shall also include an analysis of any data gaps identified by the center, and any 
recommendations with respect to efforts to address such gaps.